Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201190-115
Nebraska Educational Telecommunications
Building in Lincoln; named the Terry M. Carpenter and Jack G. McBride Educational Telecommunications
Building.

The Nebraska Educational Telecommunications Building
in Lincoln, Nebraska, shall be named and known as the Terry M. Carpenter and Jack G. McBride Educational
Telecommunications Building.

Laws 1978, LB 955, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB122, § 1.